Louisiana, session 2026, HB668.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 811 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Art. 811. Partition by licitation or by private sale
A. When the thing held in indivision is not susceptible to partition in kind,
the court shall decree a partition by licitation or, as provided in Paragraph B of this
Article, by private sale and the proceeds shall be distributed to the co-owners in
proportion to their shares.
B. In the event that one or more of the co-owners are absentees or have not
consented to a partition by private sale, the court shall order a partition by private
sale and shall give first priority to the private sale between the existing co-owners,
over the sale by partition by licitation or private sale to third persons. The court shall
order the partition by private sale between the existing co-owners as identified in the
conveyance records as of the date of filing for the petition for partition by private
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1148 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 668
sale. The petition for partition by private sale shall be granted first priority, and the
sale shall be executed under Title IX of Book VII of the Code of Civil Procedure.
Section 2. Code of Civil Procedure Articles 4607, 4622(B), 4624, and 4625(A) are
hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Civil Procedure Article 4607.1 is hereby enacted
to read as follows:
Art. 4607. Partition by licitation or by private sale
When a partition is to be made by licitation, the sale shall be conducted at
public auction and after the advertisements required for judicial sales under
execution. When a partition is to be made at private sale without the consent of all
co-owners, the sale shall be for not less than the appraised fair market value of the
property, and documents required pursuant to a court order to effect the sale shall be
executed on behalf of the absentee or nonconsenting co-owner by a court-appointed
representative, who may be a co-owner, on behalf of all co-owners after the
advertisements required for judicial sales under execution are made. The court may
order that a partition by private sale be effectuated only after the thing has been
marketed in a commercially reasonable manner considering the nature of the thing.
All counsel of record, including attorneys appointed to represent absentee
defendants, and persons appearing in proper person shall be given notice of the sale
date. At any time prior to the sale, the parties may agree upon a nonjudicial
partition.
Art. 4607.1. Judgment ordering reimbursement or payment of amounts due to
co-owner and payment and allocation of costs of private sale out of proceeds
of sale
A judgment ordering the private sale of property to effect a partition in
accordance with this Chapter shall order out of the proceeds of the sale all of the
following:
(1) The reimbursement to a co-owner of the amount due to the co-owner for
the payment of taxes on the property and the expenses of preservation of the
property.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1148 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 668
(2) The payment to a co-owner of the amount due to the co-owner by another
co-owner who has received and retained the fruits and revenues of the property.
(3)(a) The payment of reasonable costs related to the sale, including real
estate commissions, brokerage fees, appraisal costs, payments associated with the
release of encumbrances, other customary closing costs, and the allocation of those
costs to one or more co-owners.
(b) The court in rendering judgment shall consider whether the costs
associated with the sale shall be paid to any person related to the co-owners within
the fourth degree or a juridical entity in which the co-owner has a direct or indirect
financial interest.
* * *
Art. 4622. Petition
* * *
B.(1) If the partition is to be made by private sale, the petition for partition
between the co-owners shall have first priority status by the court and shall include
all of the following:
(a)(1) The primary terms of the proposed sale.
(b)(2) The name of the proposed purchaser and whether the proposed
purchaser is a co-owner or third party in accordance with Civil Code Article 811(B).
(c) The source or location of funds to be used in the sale.
(d) If the proposed purchaser is a juridical entity, including but not limited
to corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, and sole proprietorships,
and whether that entity has a relationship with any co-owner.
(e)(3) Whether any costs associated with the sale will be paid to any person
related to the petitioning co-owners within the fourth degree or a juridical entity in
which the co-owner has a direct or indirect financial interest.
(2) Upon judgment of the court ordering the sale, payment shall be made
within twenty-four hours using cash or certified funds.
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1148 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 668
Art. 4624. Publication of notice
Notice of the institution of the proceeding shall be published at least once in
the parish where the partition proceeding is instituted, in the manner provided by
law. This notice shall set forth the title and docket number of the proceeding, the
name and address of the court, a description of the property sought to be partitioned,
and the primary terms of the private sale and shall notify the absent defendant that
the plaintiff is seeking to have the property partitioned by licitation or by private sale
under in accordance with Civil Code Article 811, this Chapter, and Chapter 1 of this
Title, and that the absent defendant has fifteen days from the date of the publication
of notice, or of the initial publication of notice if there is more than one publication,
to answer the plaintiff's petition. If the property sought to be partitioned is a
corporeal immovable, the petitioner, contemporaneous with publication of notice,
shall affix a copy of the notice in at least one prominent location on the immovable.
Art. 4625. Trial; judgment ordering sale
A. Except as otherwise provided in Article 4630, if the petitioner proves on
the trial of the proceeding that he is a co-owner of the property and entitled to the
partition thereof and that the defendant is an absentee who owns an interest therein,
the court shall render judgment ordering either the public sale of the property for
cash by the sheriff to effect a partition, after the advertisement required by law for
a sale under execution, or the private sale of the property for cash not less than fair
market value and that the documents required to effectuate the sale, be executed on
behalf of the absentee or nonconsenting co-owner by a court-appointed
representative, who may be a co-owner, under this Chapter and Chapter 1 of this
Title, and after the advertisement required by law for a sale under execution.
* * *
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1148 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 668